ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 농구 > 농구 훈련 장비: 농구 코칭 보드; 농구 코트 마킹 스텐실; 농구 방어 연습용 모형; 농구 드리블 연습용 고글; 농구 점프 트레이너; 농구 패싱 타겟; 농구 리바운더; 농구 슈팅 훈련 장비; 농구 훈련 매트 및 플로어 마커
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Basquetebol > Auxiliares de treino para basquetebol: Quadros táticos de basquetebol; Moldes de marcação de campo de basquetebol; Manequins de defesa para basquetebol; Óculos de drible para basquetebol; Artigos de treino para saltos; Alvos de passe de basquetebol; Ressaltadores de basquetebol; Artigos de auxílio para lançamento; Tapetes de treino e marcadores de chão de basquetebol
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Basketbal > Tréninkové pomůcky na basketbal: Trenérské tabule pro basketbal; Šablony na lajnování basketbalového hřiště; Figuríny basketbalového obránce; Basketbalové brýle na dribling; Basketbalové pomůcky pro trénování výskoku; Terče pro trénink basketbalových přihrávek; Basketbalové odrážecí sítě; Basketbalové pomůcky pro nácvik střelby; Tréninkové podložky a značky na podlahu pro basketbal
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Баскетбол > Тренировочный инвентарь для баскетбола: Тактические доски для баскетбола; Трафареты для разметки баскетбольной площадки; Манекены-защитники для баскетбола; Очки для отработки ведения мяча; Тренажеры для отработки прыжков; Мишени для отработки паса (баскетбол); Баскетбольные ребаундеры; Инвентарь для отработки бросков; Баскетбольные тренировочные коврики и маркеры для пола
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Krepšinis > Krepšinio treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės: Krepšinio trenerių taktinės lentos; Krepšinio aikštelės ženklinimo trafaretai; Krepšinio gynybiniai manekenai; Krepšinio kamuolio varymosi akiniai; Krepšinio šokinėjimo treniruokliai; Krepšinio perdavimų taikiniai; Krepšinio atšokimo treniruokliai; Krepšinio mėtymo pagalbinės priemonės; Krepšinio treniruočių kilimėliai ir grindų žymekliai
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Koszykówka > Sprzęt treningowy do koszykówki: Tablice trenerskie do koszykówki; Szablony do wyznaczania boisk do koszykówki; Manekiny obrony do koszykówki; Gogle do koszykówki; Trenażer do skakania do koszykówki; Cele do podań do koszykówki; Trenażery do zbiórek do koszykówki; Pomoce do ćwiczenia rzutów do koszykówki; Maty treningowe i znaczniki podłogowe do koszykówki
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > バスケットボール > バスケットボール練習器具: バスケットボール用作戦ボード; バスケットボールコート用ライン引きステンシル; バスケットボール用守備用マネキン; バスケットボール用ドリブルゴーグル; バスケットボール用ジャンプトレーナー; バスケットボール用パスターゲット; バスケットボール用リバウンダー; バスケットボール用シュート練習器具; バスケットボール用トレーニングマット・フロアマーカー
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Basket-ball > Matériel d'entraînement de basket-ball: Tableaux d'entraîneur de basket-ball; Pochoirs de marquage pour terrains de basket-ball; Mannequins défensifs de basket-ball; Lunettes de dribble de basket-ball; Entraînement au saut de basket-ball; Cibles de passe de basket-ball; Filets de rebond de basket-ball; Aides au tir pour basket-ball; Tapis d'entraînement et marqueurs de sol de basket-ball
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Koripallo > Koripallon harjoitusvälineet: Koripallon taktiikkataulut; Koripallokentän merkintäsapluunat; Koripallon puolustusmallinuket; Koripallonkuljetuslasit; Koripallohyppyjen harjoittelun apuvälineet; Koripallon syöttömaalit; Koripallon palautusverkot; Korinteon apuvälineet; Koripallon harjoitusmatot ja lattiamerkit
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng rổ > Thiết bị đào tạo bóng rổ: Bảng chiến thuật bóng rổ; Khuôn kẻ vạch sân bóng rổ; Người giả phòng thủ bóng rổ; Kính tập bóng rổ; Dụng cụ tập nhảy chơi bóng rổ; Mục tiêu tập chuyền bóng rổ; Lưới tập bắt bóng bật bảng; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ ném bóng rổ; Thảm và vạch đánh dấu sàn tập bóng rổ
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > บาสเก็ตบอล > อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมบาสเกตบอล: กระดานวางแผนบาสเกตบอล; แผ่นสเตนซิลตีเส้นสนามบาสเกตบอล; หุ่นป้องกันบาสเกตบอล; แว่นตาเลี้ยงลูกบาสเกตบอล; ตัวช่วยฝึกกระโดดสำหรับบาสเกตบอล; เป้าซ้อมส่งลูกบาสเกตบอล; ตาข่ายสะท้อนลูกบาสเกตบอล; อุปกรณ์ช่วยซ้อมการยิงลูกบาสเกตบอล; เสื่อฝึกซ้อมและมาร์กเกอร์พื้นสนามบาสเกตบอล
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Košarka > Pomagala za košarkaški trening: Košarkaške ploče za treniranje; Šablone za označavanje košarkaškog terena; Košarkaške lutke za trening; Košarkaške naočale za dribling; Trenažeri za skakanje za košarku; Mete za dodavanje u košarci; Odbijajuće mreže za košarku; Košarkaška pomagala za šut; Prostirke i podne oznake za vježbanje košarke
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Basket > Supporti di allenamento per il basket: Lavagne tattiche da basket; Stencil per la tracciatura del campo da basket; Manichini difensivi per basket; Occhiali da basket per palleggio; Scarpe da basket per salto; Bersagli per passaggi da basket; Rimbalzatori da basket; Aiuti per il tiro nel basket; Tappetini e marcatori da terra per allenamento a basket
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Basketbol > Basketbol Eğitim Araçları: Basketbol taktik tahtaları; Basketbol sahası işaretleme şablonları; Basketbol Savunma Mankenleri; Basketbol Top Sürme Gözlüğü; Basketbol Sıçrama Çalıştırıcıları; Basketbol pas hedefleri; Basketbol ribaund ağları; Basketbol Atış Yardımcıları; Basketbol antrenman matları ve zemin işaretleyicileri
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 篮球用品 > 棒球训练辅助设备: 篮球战术板; 篮球场划线模板; 篮球防守人体模型; 篮球运球护目镜; 篮球弹跳训练器; 篮球传球标靶; 篮球反弹网; 篮球投篮辅助用品; 篮球训练垫与地板标记
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Basketball > Opplæringshjelp for basketball: Taktikktavler for basketball; Sjablonger for banemerking til basketball; Forsvarsdukker for basketball; Driblebriller for basketball; Hoppetreningshjelpemidler for basketball; Pasningsblinker for basketball; Reboundere for basketball; Kastehjelpemidler for basketball; Treningsmatter og gulvmarkører for basketball
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Kosárlabda > Kosárlabda-edzéssegédek: Kosárlabda edzői táblák; Kosárlabdapálya-jelölő sablonok; Kosárlabda-védekezőmanökenek; Kosárlabda-cselezőszemüvegek; Kosárlabda-ugróedzők; Kosárlabda passzolási célpontok; Kosárlabda visszapattanó hálók; Kosárlabda-dobósegédek; Kosárlabda edzőszőnyegek és padlójelölők
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Μπάσκετ > Βοηθήματα προπόνησης μπάσκετ: Πίνακες τακτικής μπάσκετ; Στένσιλ διαγράμμισης γηπέδου μπάσκετ; Αμυντικά ομοιώματα μπάσκετ; Γυαλιά ντρίμπλας μπάσκετ; Προπονητές άλματος μπάσκετ; Στόχοι πάσας μπάσκετ; Δίχτυα επαναφοράς μπάσκετ; Βοηθήματα σουτ μπάσκετ; Στρώματα προπόνησης και δείκτες δαπέδου μπάσκετ
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Baloncesto > Accesorios para entrenamiento de baloncesto: Pizarras de táctica para básquetbol; Plantillas para marcar canchas de básquetbol; Muñecos defensivos de baloncesto; Gafas de regate de baloncesto; Zapatillas de salto de baloncesto; Objetivos de pase para básquetbol; Rebotadores para básquetbol; Ayudas para tiro de baloncesto; Marcadores de piso y tapetes de entrenamiento para básquetbol
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 籃球 > 棒球訓練輔助用具: 籃球戰術板; 籃球場劃線模板; 籃球防守人體模型; 籃球運球護目鏡; 籃球彈跳訓練器; 籃球傳球標靶; 籃球反彈網; 籃球投籃輔助工具; 籃球訓練墊與地板標示
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Basketball > Træningsudstyr til basketball: Taktiktavler til basketball; Stencils til baneopmærkning til basketball; Basketball – defensive mannequiner; Basketball – driblebriller; Basketball – springtræning; Afleveringsmål til basketball; Reboundere til basketball; Basketball – skydemål; Træningsmåtter og gulvmarkører til basketball
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Mingi de baschet > Articole antrenament baschet: Table tactice pentru baschet; Șabloane pentru marcarea terenului de baschet; Manechine defensive baschet; Ochelari de dribling pentru baschet; Articole antrenament sărituri baschet; Ținte de antrenament pentru pasă la baschet; Reboundere de baschet; Articole antrenament aruncări baschet; Saltele de antrenament și marcaje de podea pentru baschet
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Баскетбол > Помощни средства за баскетболна тренировка: Треньорски табла за баскетбол; Шаблони за маркиране на баскетболни игрища; Манекени за защита за баскетбол; Очила за практикуване на дрибъл в баскетбола; Помощни средства за скачане в баскетбола; Мишени за подаване на баскетболни топки; Мрежи за рикошет за баскетбол; Помощни средства за стрелба в баскетбола; Тренировъчни постелки и маркировки за баскетболни тренировки
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Basketball > Basketball-Trainingshilfen: Taktiktafeln für Basketball; Markierungsschablonen für Basketballfelder; Basketball-Defensiv-Mannequins; Basketball-Dribble-Brille; Basketball-Sprungtrainer; Passziele für Basketball; Basketball-Rebounder; Basketball-Wurfhilfen; Basketball-Trainingsmatten & Bodenmarkierungen
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Basketboll > Träningshjälpmedel för basketboll: Taktiktavlor för basket; Schabloner för linjemarkering på basketplan; Defensiva dockor för basket; Dribbelglasögon för basket; Hopptränare för basketboll; Passningsmål för basket; Rebounders för basket; Skjuthjälpmedel för basketboll; Träningsmattor och golvmarkörer för basket
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Basketbal > Hulpmiddelen voor basketbaltraining: Coachborden voor basketbal; Sjablonen voor veldmarkering bij basketbal; Defensieve basketbalpoppen; Basketbaldribbelbrillen; Basketbalspringtrainers; Passdoelen voor basketbal; Rebounders voor basketbal; Basketbalschiethulpmiddelen; Trainingsmatten en vloermarkeringen voor basketbal
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Basquete > Equipamentos auxiliares para treinar basquete: Pranchetas táticas de basquete; Moldes de marcação de quadra de basquete; Manequins defensivos para basquete; Óculos de drible para basquete; Treinadores de salto para basquete; Alvos de passe para basquete; Telas de rebote para basquete; Auxílios de arremesso para basquete; Tapetes de treinamento e marcadores de piso para basquete
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Basketbal > Basketbalové tréningové pomôcky: Trénerské tabule pre basketbal; Šablóny na značenie basketbalového ihriska; Basketbalové obranné figuríny; Basketbalové okuliare na driblovanie; Basketbalové skákacie trenažéry; Ciele prihrávok v basketbale; Odrazové dosky na basketbal; Basketbalové strelecké pomôcky; Tréningové podložky a podlahové značenia na basketbal
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Basketball > Basketball Training Aids: Basketball Coaching Boards; Basketball Court Marking Stencils; Basketball Defensive Mannequins; Basketball Dribble Goggles; Basketball Jump Trainers; Basketball Passing Targets; Basketball Rebounders; Basketball Shooting Aids; Basketball Training Mats & Floor Markers
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Košarka > Pripomočki za vadbo košarke: Trenerske table za košarko; Šablone za označevanje košarkarskih igrišč; Košarkarske obrambne lutke; Košarkarska očala za vodenje; Naprave za trening skoka v košarki; Tarče za podaje pri košarki; Košarkarski odbijalci; Pripomočki za izboljšanje metanja v košarki; Košarkarske vadbene podloge in talne oznake